Virginia statutes. Constitution of Virginia [1971]
Revision of Constitution. —

A general revision of the Constitution of Virginia was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1969 Extra Session (Acts 1969, Ex. Sess., c. 27) and referred to the 1970 session. It was again agreed to at that session (Acts 1970, cc. 763, 786) and was ratified by the people on Nov. 3, 1970.

Three other constitutional amendments were ratified by the people at the election held Nov. 3, 1970. The amendment proposed and agreed to by Acts 1969, Ex. Sess., c. 30, and Acts 1970, cc. 763, 787, added subdivision (b) to Art. X, § 9. The amendment proposed and agreed to by Acts 1969, Ex. Sess., c. 31, and Acts 1970, cc. 763, 788, added subdivision (c) to Art. X, § 9. The amendment proposed and agreed to by Acts 1969, Ex. Sess., c. 28, and Acts 1970, cc. 763, 789, repealed § 60 of the Constitution of 1902, which prohibited lotteries and the sale of lottery tickets.

Annotations from cases construing the various sections of the Constitution of 1902 have been placed, where appropriate, under similar provisions of the revised Constitution.